Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.035

Inspection of property, premises, or records—Denial of access—Search warrant.

In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the director may enter at reasonable times as determined by the director and inspect any property or premises and any records required under this chapter. If the director is denied access to any property, premises, or records, the director may suspend, cancel, or refuse certification or other approval of the planting stock or may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the property, premises, or records. The court may upon the application issue a search warrant for the purpose requested.

[ 1999 c 144 s 4.]